Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.64.061

Amended abstracts.

(1) Upon completion of the canvass of a recount, the canvassing board shall prepare and certify an amended abstract showing the votes cast in each precinct for which the recount was conducted. Copies of the amended abstracts must be transmitted to the same officers who received the abstract on which the recount was based.

(2) If the office or issue for which the recount was conducted was filed with the county auditor, the canvassing board shall file the amended abstract with the original results of that election or primary.

(3) If the office or issue for which a recount was conducted was filed with the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall canvass the amended abstracts and shall file an amended abstract with the original results of that election. The secretary of state may require that the amended abstracts be certified by each canvassing board on a uniform date.

(4) An amended abstract certified under this section supersedes any prior abstract of the results for the same offices or issues at the same primary or election.

[ 2013 c 11 s 69; 2005 c 243 s 21; 2004 c 271 s 180.]